Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1223
Physician medical director; required.

Each licensed emergency medical service shall have a physician medical director.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5183;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 507.